Washington statutes.
RCW 36.57.080

Transfer of transportation powers and rights to authority—Funds—Contract indebtedness.

On the effective date of the proposition approved by the voters in accord with RCW 35.95.040 or 82.14.045, as now or hereafter amended, the authority shall have and exercise all rights with respect to the construction, acquisition, maintenance, operation, extension, alteration, repair, control and management of passenger transportation which the county or any city located within such county shall have been previously empowered to exercise and such powers shall not thereafter be exercised by the county or such cities without the consent of the authority. The county and all cities within such county upon demand of the authority shall transfer to the authority all unexpended funds earmarked or budgeted from any source for public transportation, including funds receivable. The county in which an authority is located shall have the power to contract indebtedness and issue bonds pursuant to chapter 36.67 RCW to enable the authority to carry out the purposes of this chapter and RCW 35.95.040 or 82.14.045, as now or hereafter amended, and the purposes of this chapter and RCW 35.95.040 or 82.14.045, as now or hereafter amended, shall constitute a "county purpose" as that term is used in chapter 36.67 RCW.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 5; 1974 ex.s. c 167 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 270: See notes following RCW 35.58.272.